Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
ATTENDANCE STUDY
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “statewide  attendance initiative” includes any
statewide policies, grant programs, support programs, communication strategies, attendance
campaigns, community partnerships or other initiatives implemented with the intent of im-
proving school attendance.
(2) The Legislative Policy and Research Director shall conduct a study regarding:
(a) Statewide attendance initiatives implemented in this state since the 2017-2018 school
year; and
(b) Statewide policies providing for the collection of attendance data.
(3) In relation  to statewide attendance initiatives implemented, as described in subsection
(2)(a) of this section, the director shall review:
(a) The original  goal of the initiative and how that goal was intended to improve school
attendance.
(b) Any differences between  how the initiative was intended to be implemented and how
the initiative was actually implemented.
(c) The effectiveness of the initiative in improving school attendance.
(d) How the level of available funding impacted the effectiveness of the initiative.
(e) Other barriers encountered in relation to the initiative.
(4) In relation to statewide policies providing for the  collection of attendance data, as
described in subsection (2)(b) of this section, the director shall review:
(a) How the collection of attendance data helped or hindered the understanding of  the
impact of statewide initiatives.
(b) Options for separating out the collection of attendance data  for school funding pur-
poses and for school improvement and student success purposes.
(5) For the purpose of the study conducted under this section:
(a) The director must consider:
Enrolled House Bill 3199 (HB 3199-B) Page 1
(A) Longitudinal performance growth targets;
(B) Technical assistance provided by education service districts;
(C) School performance reports; and
(D) Average daily membership data collection.
(b) The director shall select a sample of school  districts and education service districts
that represents a variety of sizes, demographic characteristics and geographic locations.
(6) All  agencies of state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, and all school districts
and education service  districts are directed to assist the director, and any entity working
under contract with the director,  in conducting the study and, to the extent permitted by
laws related to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice necessary for the director
or contractor to complete the study.
(7) The director shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to the in-
terim committees of the Legislative Assembly related  to education no later than September
30, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
ATTENDANCE ADVISORY COMMITTEE
SECTION 3. (1) The Department of Education shall convene an advisory  committee to
review the study conducted under section  1 of this 2025 Act and to recommend for adoption
by the State Board of Education a policy regarding the improvement of school attendance,
with an emphasis on student groups  who have historically experienced academic disparities,
as identified in ORS 327.180 (2)(b).
(2) The advisory committee convened under this section shall include:
(a) One member who is a representative of the Department of Human Services;
(b) One member who is a representative of the Department of Education;
(c) One member who is a representative of the State Board of Education;
(d) One member who is a representative of the Educator Advancement Council;
(e) One member who is a representative of the Youth Development Division;
(f) One member who is a representative of an association that represents school boards;
(g) One member who is a representative of an association that  primarily represents li-
censed educators;
(h) One member who is a representative of an association that primarily represents
classified educator staff;
(i) One member who is a representative of a coalition that  represents school adminis-
trators;
(j) One member  who is a representative of an association that represents education ser-
vice districts;
(k) Three members  who are teachers or administrators and who represent a variety of
sizes of school districts in a variety of geographic locations in this state; and
(L) Three members who represent community-based organizations that support families
from student groups that have historically experienced  academic disparities, as described in
ORS 327.180 (2)(b).
(3) The advisory committee convened under this section  shall provide information that
the Department of Education may use to develop a memorandum  of understanding with the
Department of Human Services, school districts and other entities  identified by the Depart-
ment of Education. The information shall include:
(a) Current practices used to improve attendance, including  family coach programming,
educator professional development on best  practices and other approaches that involve col-
laboration between school districts and the Department of Human Services; and
(b) Common practices that involve formal communication between  educators, school
districts and the Department of Human Services.
Enrolled House Bill 3199 (HB 3199-B) Page 2
(4) The Department of Education shall submit a  report in the manner provided by ORS
192.245 to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education no later
than:
(a) November 30, 2026, for a preliminary  report on the progress of the advisory commit-
tee; and
(b) February 15, 2027, for the final report of the advisory committee.
SECTION 4.
The Department of Education shall first convene the advisory committee
established under section 3 of this 2025 Act no later than May 31, 2026.
SECTION 5. Section 3 of this 2025 Act is repealed on June 30, 2027.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 6. The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the  reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 7. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 25, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3199 (HB 3199-B) Page 3